New York, session 2025-2026, A6405.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Employees of the county of Schuyler serving as animal control 4 officers for such county; provided, however, that nothing in this subdi- 5 vision shall be deemed to authorize such animal control officers to 6 carry, possess, repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate 7 license therefor has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal 8 law. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "animal control 9 officer" shall have the same meaning as defined by section twenty-one 10 hundred forty of the public health law. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04623-01-5